Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-14,102
Noncompliance by tenant affecting health and safety; landlord's rights.

If there is noncompliance by a tenant with section 76-1493 materially affecting health and safety or any condition which is ordered to be changed by the State Fire Marshal, the State Electrical Board, the Department of Health and Human Services, or any other regulatory body with jurisdiction over either the park or the mobile home space that can be remedied by repair, replacement of a damaged item, or cleaning, and the tenant fails to comply as promptly as conditions require in case of emergency or within fourteen days after written notice by the landlord specifying the breach and requesting that the tenant remedy the breach or take reasonable steps to remedy it within that period of time, the landlord may enter the mobile home space, cause the work to be done in a skillful manner, and submit an itemized bill for the actual and reasonable cost or the fair and reasonable value as additional rent on the next date when periodic rent is due or, if the rental agreement has been terminated, for immediate payment. If the landlord is assessed any fine, cost, or charge as a result of the tenant's failure to comply with an order issued by the State Fire Marshal, the State Electrical Board, the Department of Health and Human Services, or any other regulatory body with jurisdiction over either the park or the mobile home space, the landlord may require the tenant to pay such fine, cost, or charge.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 53;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 794;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 701.